Utah statutes.
35A-2-201.   Services provided at regional workforce services areas.
(1)  Regional workforce services areas shall:
(a)  through its employment centers, be the primary provider of services and
support under Chapter 3, Employment Support Act;
(b)  broker or contract for services or training under Chapter 5, Training and
Workforce Improvement Act; and
(c)  serve as a regional clearinghouse of information concerning workforce
development and services and support available under this title.
(2) (a)  In providing, brokering, or contracting for the services or training
described in Subsection (1)(b), the regional director of a regional workforce
services area in consultation with the executive director shall ensure that
the regional workforce services area provides, brokers, or contracts for
services and training that meets the needs of the special needs population in
the regional workforce services area.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), "special needs population" means
individuals who have special employment needs based on factors including race,
gender, age, economic status, education, language skills, and work history.
